Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2663.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 502(a)(1) and (2) of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, are amended to read:Section 502. Consideration of applications and inspections.(a) Applications for permits and inspections.--(1) Every application for a construction permit for one-family and two-family dwelling units and utility and miscellaneous use structures shall be granted or denied[, in whole or in part,] within 15 business days of the filing date or, if the drawings have been prepared by design professionals who are licensed or registered under the laws 1234567891011121314151617181920 and regulations of this Commonwealth and the application contains a certification by the licensed or registered design professional that the plans meet the applicable standards of the Uniform Construction Code and ordinance as appropriate, within five business days of the filing date. Every application for a certificate of occupancy for one-family and two-family dwelling units and miscellaneous use structures shall be granted or denied[, in whole or in part,] within five business days, or within ten business days in cities of the first class, after receipt of a final inspection report indicates compliance with the Uniform Construction Code and ordinance as appropriate. All other construction permits shall be granted or denied[, in whole or in part,] within 30 business days of the filing date. Municipalities may establish different time limits to consider applications for construction permits in historic districts. A code administrator shall review a construction plan of a building permit application upon submission and shall issue a notice of construction plan approval on a building permit application within the periods set forth in this section if the construction plans comply with the Construction Code Act and any other applicable municipal construction code ordinance. The municipality shall also provide a list of all other required permits necessary prior to issuance of the building permit. The municipality will not be liable for the completeness of any list. When a construction plan has been approved, a code administrator shall issue a building permit immediately upon receipt of all other required permits or approvals related to the construction. All revisions or changes to construction plans so approved under this 20260HB2663PN3698 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection shall necessitate an additional plan review prior to the issuing of the building permit.(2) If an application is denied [in whole or in part], the code administrator shall set forth the reasons in writing, identifying the elements of the application which are not in compliance with the relevant provisions of the Uniform Construction Code and ordinance as appropriate and providing a citation to the relevant provisions of the Uniform Construction Code and ordinance as appropriate.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2663PN3698 - 3 - 1234567891011